test/src/morphology/adj-ahoeh.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
  Adjective - båadtsah: # 
    båadtsah+A+Attr: båadtsah 
    båadtsah+A+Sg+Nom: [båadtsah, båadtsan, båadtsa]
    båadtsah+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båadtsahkabpa, båadtsahkåbpoe, båadtsahkabpa]
    båadtsah+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [båadtsahkommes, båadtsahkommes]

  Adjective - båadtsoeh: # 
    båadtsoeh+A+Attr: [båadtsoeh, båadtsoeh]
    båadtsoeh+A+Sg+Nom: [båadtsoeh, båadtsan]
    båadtsoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båadtsoehkabpa, båadtsoehkåbpoe] # Den 1. forma er sørleg
    båadtsoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: båadtsoehkommes

  Adjective - båajhtoeh: # 
    båajhtoeh+A+Attr: båajhtoeh 
    båajhtoeh+A+Sg+Nom: båajhtoeh 

  Adjective - båavjoeh: # 
    båavjoeh+A+Attr: båavjoeh 
    båavjoeh+A+Sg+Nom: båavjoeh 
    båavjoeh+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båavjoehkabpa, båavjoehkåbpoe]
    båavjoeh+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: båavjoehkommes

  Adjective - dåankah: #   dåanka= nomen
    dåankah+A+Attr: [dåankah, tjåankah]
    dåankah+A+Sg+Nom: [dåankan, tjåankan]
    dåankah+A+Sg+Gen: [dåankan, tjåankan]
    dåankah+A+Sg+Acc: [dåankam, tjåankam]
    dåankah+A+Sg+Ill: [dåankese, tjåankese]
    dåankah+A+Sg+Ine: [dåankesne, tjåankesne]
    dåankah+A+Sg+Ela: [dåankeste, tjåankeste]
    dåankah+A+Sg+Com: [dåankene, tjåankene]
    dåankah+A+Pl+Nom: [dåankah, tjåankah]
    dåankah+A+Pl+Gen: [dåankaj, tjåankaj]
    dåankah+A+Pl+Acc: [dåankide, tjåankide]
    dåankah+A+Pl+Ill: [dåankide, tjåankide]
    dåankah+A+Pl+Ine: [dåankine, tjåankine]
    dåankah+A+Pl+Ela: [dåankijste, tjåankijste]
    dåankah+A+Pl+Com: [dåankajgujmie, tjåankajgujmie]
    dåankah+A+Ess: [dåankine, tjåankine]
    dåankah+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dåankahkåbpoe, tjåankahkåbpoe]
    dåankah+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dåankahkommes, tjåankahkommes]
